Maryland, session 2025, SB0721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
4–506.
(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the court shall
issue a permanent protective order under this subsection against an individual if:
(i) an interim, temporary, or final protective order has been issued
under this subtitle against the individual;
(ii) 1. the individual was convicted and sentenced to serve a term
of imprisonment of at least 5 years for the act of abuse that led to the issuance of the
interim, temporary, or final protective order and the individual has served at least 12
months of the sentence; [or]
2. A. during the term of the interim, temporary, or final
protective order, the individual committed an act of abuse against the person eligible for
relief; and
B. the individual was convicted and sentenced to serve a term
of imprisonment of at least 5 years for the act and has served at least 12 months of the
sentence; [and] OR
3. THE INDIVIDUAL CONSENTS TO THE ISSUANCE OF THE
PERMANENT PROTECTIVE ORDER; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 537 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) the victim of the act of abuse described in item (ii)1 or 2 of this
paragraph, who was the person eligible for relief in the interim, temporary, or final
protective order, requests the issuance of a permanent protective order under this
subsection.
(2) In a permanent protective order issued under this subsection, the court
may grant only the relief that was granted in the original protective order under §
4–504.1(c)(1) or (2) or § 4–505(a)(2)(i) or (ii) of this subtitle or subsection (d)(1) or (2) of this
section.
(3) Unless terminated at the request of the victim, a protective order issued
under this subsection shall be permanent.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –